District of Columbia statutes.
21-1502

Repealed

Filing of petition; requirements; time and place of hearings; appointment of guardian ad litem

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 3, 34 DCR 632
1981 Ed., §§ 21-1501 to 21-1507.
Presumption of capacity, see § 21-2203.